Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.450

Investigations—Scope—Publishing information.

The director may make such public or private investigations or may make such requests for information, within or without this state, as the director deems necessary to determine whether any registration should be granted, denied, suspended, or revoked, or a fine imposed, or whether any person has violated or is about to violate any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule, order, or permit under this chapter, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in prescribing of rules and forms under, and amendments to, this chapter and may publish information concerning any violation of this chapter or any rule or order under this chapter.

[ 1988 c 159 s 22; 1982 c 69 s 16.]